Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CAMP BLISS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Grant program; eligibility; reimbursement requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of administration must issue a grant to Independent Lifestyles, Inc., for expenses related to retreats for eligible veterans and their family members at Camp Bliss in Walker. new text end new text begin (b) The grant recipient may use grant money to: new text end new text begin (1) provide therapy, transportation, and activities customized for eligible veterans and their family members; and new text end new text begin (2) perform general maintenance of the camp. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must reimburse the grant recipient at least $850 for each eligible veteran or family member who the commissioner verifies attended the camp and received services from the grant recipient. The commissioner must disburse money to the grant recipient for up to two visits per year to the camp for each eligible veteran or family member. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Eligible veteran" means a person who is: new text end new text begin (1) a former armed forces service member who has a DD-214 or other official document from the official military personnel file of the veteran that describes the honorable service of the veteran; or new text end new text begin (2) a current armed forces member, whether serving in the active or reserve component. new text end new text begin (c) "Family member" means an eligible veteran's spouse, domestic partner, or child. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for the grant described in subdivision 1, paragraph (a). new text end